Indiana, session 2026, HB1213.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-2.5-4-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.137-2022,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A power subsidiary or a person engaged as
a public utility is a retail merchant making a retail transaction when the
subsidiary or person furnishes or sells electrical energy, natural or
artificial gas, water, steam, or steam heating service to a person for
commercial or domestic consumption.
(b) A power subsidiary or a person engaged as a public utility
is not a retail merchant making a retail transaction when the
subsidiary or person furnishes or sells electrical energy, natural or
artificial gas, water, steam, or steam heating service to a person for
domestic consumption.
SECTION 2. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) IC 6-2.5-4-5, as
amended by this act, applies only to retail transactions occurring
after June 30, 2026.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a retail transaction is
considered to have occurred after June 30, 2026, if the property
2026 IN 1213—LS 6023/DI 134


whose transfer constitutes selling at retail is delivered to the
purchaser or to the place of delivery designated by the purchaser
after June 30, 2026.
(c) Notwithstanding the delivery of the property constituting
selling at retail after June 30, 2026, a transaction is considered to
have occurred before July 1, 2026, to the extent that:
(1) the agreement of the parties to the transaction is entered
into before July 1, 2026; and
(2) payment for the property furnished in the transaction is
made before July 1, 2026.
(d) This SECTION expires January 1, 2029.
2026 IN 1213—LS 6023/DI 134